District of Columbia statutes.
1-327.56a

Authorized use of 911.

(a)

The District’s 911 call system shall be reserved exclusively for emergency calls.

(b)

The Mayor shall not use the 911 call system for administrative purposes, for placing outgoing calls, or for receiving non-emergency calls.

(c)

Upon March 19, 2013, the Mayor shall publicize that the 911 call system shall be used exclusively for emergency calls. Any current or future publication or outreach conducted by the Mayor related to the 911 call system shall comply with the requirements of this section.

Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 3207a
as added Mar. 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-248, § 2, 60 DCR 112
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-248 added this section.